Louisiana, session 2026, HB1205.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 12 of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950,
comprised of R.S. 38:2431 through 2466, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 12. AQUIFER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS
§2431. Legislative findings; purpose
A. The increasing use of water for municipal, industrial, agricultural,
recreational, and other purposes is a matter of great public interest and the
unregulated use of groundwater from the aquifer systems of the state may create
critical, irreversible problems. The public welfare requires that these vital water
sources be put to the highest beneficial use.
Page 1 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
B. The purpose of this Chapter is to establish a commission dedicated to the
monitoring, protection, and sustainable management of each aquifer system in the
state in order to provide for the efficient administration, conservation, and orderly
development of these groundwater resources.
§2432. Definitions
Unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the
following meanings for purposes of this Chapter:
(1) "Beneficial purpose" or "beneficial use" means the use of groundwater
for domestic, municipal, industrial, agricultural, recreational, or therapeutic purposes
or any other advantageous use.
(2) "Board" means the board of commissioners of a district.
(3) "Commissioner" means a member of the board of a district who has been
commissioned in accordance with this Chapter.
(4) "District" means a groundwater conservation district.
(5) "Groundwater" means water suitable for any beneficial purpose
percolating below the earth's surface.
(6 ) "Secretary" means the secretary of the Department of Conservation and
Energy.
(7) "User" means any person who produces groundwater in the district in
excess of fifty thousand gallons for any day during any calendar year from a well or
wells owned or operated by such person or from a well or wells owned or operated
solely for the production of water used by such person.
(8) "Well" or "water well" means any well drilled or constructed for the
principal purpose of producing groundwater.
PART I. MISSISSIPPI RIVER ALLUVIAL GROUNDWATER
CONSERVATION DISTRICT
§2441. District and board; creation
A. The Mississippi River Alluvial Groundwater Conservation District is
hereby established as a political subdivision of the state.
Page 2 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
B. The district shall be administered by a board of commissioners whose
members shall be commissioned as provided by this Part.
§2442. Board of commissioners; membership
A. The board of commissioners for the district shall consist of thirty voting
members appointed and commissioned by the governor as follows:
(1) One member from each of the parishes of Assumption, Avoyelles,
Caldwell, Catahoula, Concordia, East Carroll, Franklin, Iberia, Iberville, LaSalle,
Madison, Morehouse, Ouachita, Point Coupee, Richland, St. Landry, St. Martin, St.
Mary, Tensas, West Baton Rouge, and West Carroll. The governor shall designate
the term of office for each member appointed pursuant to this Paragraph so that,
insofar as possible, one-third of the initial members shall serve a one-year term, one-
third a two-year term, and one-third a three-year term.
(2) Three members from nominees provided by industrial and agricultural
user groups in the district commissioned in such manner that the wood products
industry, agriculture, and other industries are each represented by one member. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member appointed pursuant to
this Paragraph so that one member shall serve a one-year term, one shall serve for
a two-year term, and one shall serve a three-year term.
(3) Six members from nominees provided by municipalities within the
district which have a minimum use of five hundred thousand gallons per day. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member commissioned pursuant
to this Paragraph so that two members shall serve a one-year term, two members
shall serve a two-year term, and two members shall serve a three-year term.
B. The initial voting members shall be nominated by the appropriate
nominating entity or group and presented to the governor on or before September 15,
2026. The members shall be commissioned by the governor on or before October
15, 2026.
C. Commissions pursuant to this Section, other than the initial commissions,
shall be for three-year terms.
Page 3 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
D. Each commission by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate for
confirmation.
E. In addition, the following may serve at their pleasure as ex officio
nonvoting members of the board and shall not be considered in determining a
quorum for the purpose of board meetings:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality or his
designee.
(2) The commissioner of agriculture and forestry or his designee.
(3) A representative of the United States Geological Survey.
(4) The secretary of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries or his
designee.
(5) The secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy or his
designee.
(6) A representative of the Louisiana Rural Water Association appointed by
the association.
(7) A representative of the Louisiana Cattlemen's Association appointed by
the association.
(8) A representative of the Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation appointed by
the federation.
(9) Each senator whose senatorial district includes any portion of any parish
included within the district or his designee.
(10) Each member of the House of Representatives whose representative
district includes any portion of any parish included within the district or his designee.
(11) One or more representatives of industrial users of the groundwater
appointed by the board to serve at its pleasure.
(12) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(13) One representative from each university located within any portion of
the district.
Page 4 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
F.(1) Terms of members commissioned pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section shall commence for those initially commissioned on October 15, 2026.
Terms for commissioners subsequently commissioned shall commence on each
October fifteenth thereafter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 42:2, a commissioner shall not
continue to discharge the duties of his office upon expiration of his term.
G.(1) Sixty days prior to the expiration of the term of any voting member,
the board shall notify the appropriate nominating entity or group entitled to make
nomination for the member's successor.
(2) In case a vacancy occurs more than ninety days prior to the end of the
member's term, the governor shall commission a replacement within thirty days of
its occurrence to fill the unexpired term, such replacement to be the nominee of the
appropriate nominating entity or group.
(3) In case a vacancy occurs ninety or less days prior to the end of the
member's term, the position shall remain vacant for the remainder of the term.
H. Commissioners shall not be compensated for their services, except that
the board may, by regulation, provide for the payment of expenses for travel outside
the district on official business.
I. A member of a parish governing authority within the district may serve as
a commissioner.
§2443. Meetings; election of officers
A. On or before November 15, 2026, the board shall meet at the call of the
governor. At its organizational meeting, the board shall:
(1) Elect a chairman, vice chairman, secretary, and treasurer.
(2) Establish its domicile within the district.
(3) Begin consideration of the study required by R.S. 38:2454.
B. The board shall meet at least once per quarter and the location of the
meetings shall rotate between the parishes of Assumption, Avoyelles, Caldwell,
Catahoula, Concordia, East Carroll, Franklin, Iberia, Iberville, LaSalle, Madison,
Page 5 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
Morehouse, Ouachita, Point Coupee, Richland, St. Landry, St. Martin, St. Mary,
Tensas, West Baton Rouge, and West Carroll. Once a meeting has been held in a
parish, no other board meeting shall be held in that parish until a meeting has been
held in each of the other parishes. However, the board may hold a meeting in any
of the aforementioned parishes to address concerns particular to that parish.
§2444. Powers of the board
A. The board shall conduct a study and survey of the groundwater resources
in the district, including but not limited to consideration of what is necessary or
advisable to conserve groundwater resources and where appropriate, prevent or
alleviate damaging or potentially damaging drawdowns, land surface subsidence, and
groundwater quality degradation.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the board shall hold hearings and may
do any of the following:
(1) Cooperate with and enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with
other governmental units and agencies of this state, with governments and agencies
of other states and of the United States, and with private agencies or other
groundwater conservation districts for the achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(2) Receive and expend funds from any source, public or private, for the
achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(3) Hire personnel and retain consultants as shall be reasonably necessary to
the performance of its functions. Personnel from other agencies shall be used
wherever practical and possible.
(4) Advise and consult with the secretary of the Department of Conservation
and Energy on matters that impact water resources within the board's jurisdiction.
§2445. Hearings
A. At hearings conducted by the board, members of the board or members
of its staff may testify and present exhibits or other evidence.
B. Notice of hearings by the board shall be given by publication in the
official journal of each parish within the district.
Page 6 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
C. When authorized by the board, the chairman of the board may subpoena
witnesses and require their attendance and testimony before the board. The chairman
may require the production of any books, papers, or records material to the questions
lawfully before the board. Subpoenas shall be served by any agent of the board, by
the sheriff, or by any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state.
No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or producing books, papers,
or records, or from obeying the subpoena of the board or of a court of record on the
ground that the testimony or evidence required by such person may tend to
incriminate or subject the person to penalty or forfeiture. Nothing in this Section
shall be construed as requiring any person to produce books, papers, or records, or
to testify in response to any inquiry not pertinent to some question lawfully before
the board or a court for determination. No natural person shall be subject to criminal
prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture relative to any testimony or evidence
required to be provided to the board or a court. However, no person testifying shall
be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury.
D. In the case of failure or refusal of a person to comply with a subpoena
issued by the chairman of the board, or in the case of the refusal of a witness to
testify or answer as to a matter regarding which the person may be lawfully
interrogated, any district court on application of the board may, in term time or in
vacation, issue an attachment to compel the person to comply with the subpoena and
to appear before the board with the requested documents and to give testimony upon
whatever matters are lawfully required. The court may punish for contempt those
disobeying its orders as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued by the court
or refusal to testify therein.
E. The board shall make a record of all hearings which shall be available for
public inspection at the office of the board during reasonable office hours.
§2446. Reports regarding groundwater resources
A. The commission shall provide a report, on or before April first annually,
regarding the district's groundwater resources to the secretary, the Senate Committee
Page 7 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
on Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Natural Resources and
Environment.
B. The report shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) The amount of water used for public supply, industrial purposes, and
agricultural purposes, respectively.
(2) Actual and projected saltwater intrusion or encroachment.
(3) Any current or projected sale of water for use outside of the state,
including the amount of water so sold and the price paid by each out-of-state user.
C. For the purposes of this report, the amount of water used for agricultural
or industrial purposes may be estimated.
PART II. CHICOT GROUNDWATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT
§2451. District and board; creation
A. The Chicot Groundwater Conservation District is hereby established as
a political subdivision of the state.
B. The district shall be administered by a board of commissioners whose
members shall be commissioned as provided by this Part.
§2452. Board of commissioners; membership
A. The board of commissioners for the district shall consist of twenty-two
voting members appointed and commissioned by the governor as follows:
(1) One member from each of the parishes of Acadia, Allen, Beauregard,
Calcasieu, Cameron, Evangeline, Iberia, Jefferson Davis, Lafayette, Rapides, St.
Landry, Vermillion, and Vernon. The governor shall designate the term of office for
each member appointed pursuant to this Paragraph so that, insofar as possible, one-
third of the initial members shall serve a one-year term, one-third a two-year term,
and one-third a three-year term.
(2) Three members from nominees provided by industrial and agricultural
user groups in the district commissioned in such manner that the wood products
industry, agriculture, and other industries are each represented by one member. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member appointed pursuant to
Page 8 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
this Paragraph so that one member shall serve a one-year term, one shall serve for
a two-year term, and one shall serve a three-year term.
(3) Six members from nominees provided by municipalities within the
district which have a minimum use of five hundred thousand gallons per day. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member commissioned pursuant
to this Paragraph so that two members shall serve a one-year term, two members
shall serve a two-year term, and two members shall serve a three-year term.
B. The initial voting members shall be nominated by the appropriate
nominating entity or group and presented to the governor on or before September 15,
2026. The members shall be commissioned by the governor on or before October
15, 2026.
C. Commissions pursuant to this Section, other than the initial commissions,
shall be for three-year terms.
D. Each commission by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate for
confirmation.
E. In addition, the following may serve at their pleasure as ex officio
nonvoting members of the board and shall not be considered in determining a
quorum for the purpose of board meetings:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality or his
designee.
(2) The commissioner of agriculture and forestry or his designee.
(3) A representative of the United States Geological Survey.
(4) The secretary of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries or his
designee.
(5) The secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy or his
designee.
(6) A representative of the Louisiana Rural Water Association appointed by
the association.
Page 9 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
(7) A representative of the Louisiana Cattlemen's Association appointed by
the association.
(8) A representative of the Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation appointed by
the federation.
(9) Each senator whose senatorial district includes any portion of any parish
included within the district or his designee.
(10) Each member of the House of Representatives whose representative
district includes any portion of any parish included within the district or his designee.
(11) One or more representatives of industrial users of the groundwater
appointed by the board to serve at its pleasure.
(12) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(13) One representative from each university located within any portion of
the district.
F.(1) Terms of members commissioned pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section shall commence for those initially commissioned on October 15, 2026.
Terms for commissioners subsequently commissioned shall commence on each
October fifteenth thereafter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 42:2, a commissioner shall not
continue to discharge the duties of his office upon expiration of his term.
G.(1) Sixty days prior to the expiration of the term of any voting member,
the board shall notify the appropriate nominating entity or group entitled to make
nomination for the member's successor.
(2) In case a vacancy occurs more than ninety days prior to the end of the
member's term, the governor shall commission a replacement within thirty days of
its occurrence to fill the unexpired term, such replacement to be the nominee of the
appropriate nominating entity or group.
(3) In case a vacancy occurs ninety or less days prior to the end of the
member's term, the position shall remain vacant for the remainder of the term.
Page 10 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
H. Commissioners shall not be compensated for their services, except that
the board may, by regulation, provide for the payment of expenses for travel outside
the district on official business.
I. A member of a parish governing authority within the district may serve as
a commissioner.
§2453. Meetings; election of officers
A. On or before November 15, 2026, the board shall meet at the call of the
governor. At its organizational meeting, the board shall:
(1) Elect a chairman, vice chairman, secretary, and treasurer.
(2) Establish its domicile within the district.
(3) Begin consideration of the study required by R.S. 38:2464.
B. The board shall meet at least once per quarter and the location of the
meetings shall rotate between the parishes of Acadia, Allen, Beauregard, Calcasieu,
Cameron, Evangeline, Iberia, Jefferson Davis, Lafayette, Rapides, St. Landry,
Vermillion, and Vernon. Once a meeting has been held in a parish, no other board
meeting shall be held in that parish until a meeting has been held in each of the other
parishes. However, the board may hold a meeting in any of the aforementioned
parishes to address concerns particular to that parish.
§2454. Powers of the board
A. The board shall conduct a study and survey of the groundwater resources
in the district, including but not limited to consideration of what is necessary or
advisable to conserve groundwater resources and where appropriate, prevent or
alleviate damaging or potentially damaging drawdowns, land surface subsidence, and
groundwater quality degradation.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the board shall hold hearings and may
do any of the following:
(1) Cooperate with and enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with
other governmental units and agencies of this state, with governments and agencies
Page 11 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
of other states and of the United States, and with private agencies or other
groundwater conservation districts for the achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(2) Receive and expend funds from any source, public or private, for the
achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(3) Hire personnel and retain consultants as shall be reasonably necessary to
the performance of its functions. Personnel from other agencies shall be used
wherever practical and possible.
(4) Advise and consult with the secretary of the Department of Conservation
and Energy on matters that impact water resources within the board's jurisdiction.
§2455. Hearings
A. At hearings conducted by the board, members of the board or members
of its staff may testify and present exhibits or other evidence.
B. Notice of hearings by the board shall be given by publication in the
official journal of each parish within the district.
C. When authorized by the board, the chairman of the board may subpoena
witnesses and require their attendance and testimony before the board. The chairman
may require the production of any books, papers, or records material to the questions
lawfully before the board. Subpoenas shall be served by any agent of the board, by
the sheriff, or by any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state.
No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or producing books, papers,
or records, or from obeying the subpoena of the board or of a court of record on the
ground that the testimony or evidence required by such person may tend to
incriminate or subject the person to penalty or forfeiture. Nothing in this Section
shall be construed as requiring any person to produce books, papers, or records, or
to testify in response to any inquiry not pertinent to some question lawfully before
the board or a court for determination. No natural person shall be subject to criminal
prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture relative to any testimony or evidence
required to be provided to the board or a court. However, no person testifying shall
be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury.
Page 12 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
D. In the case of failure or refusal of a person to comply with a subpoena
issued by the chairman of the board, or in the case of the refusal of a witness to
testify or answer as to a matter regarding which the person may be lawfully
interrogated, any district court on application of the board may, in term time or in
vacation, issue an attachment to compel the person to comply with the subpoena and
to appear before the board with the requested documents and to give testimony upon
whatever matters are lawfully required. The court may punish for contempt those
disobeying its orders as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued by the court
or refusal to testify therein.
E. The board shall make a record of all hearings which shall be available for
public inspection at the office of the board during reasonable office hours.
§2456. Reports regarding groundwater resources
A. The commission shall provide a report, on or before April first annually,
regarding the district's groundwater resources to the secretary, the Senate Committee
on Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Natural Resources and
Environment.
B. The report shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) The amount of water used for public supply, industrial purposes, and
agricultural purposes, respectively.
(2) Actual and projected saltwater intrusion or encroachment.
(3) Any current or projected sale of water for use outside of the state,
including the amount of water so sold and the price paid by each out-of-state user.
C. For the purposes of this report, the amount of water used for agricultural
or industrial purposes may be estimated.
PART III. SOUTHERN HILLS GROUNDWATER
CONSERVATION DISTRICT
§2461. District and board; creation
A. The Southern Hills Groundwater Conservation District is hereby
established as a political subdivision of the state.
Page 13 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
B. The district shall be administered by a board of commissioners whose
members shall be commissioned as provided by this Part.
§2462. Board of commissioners; membership
A. The board of commissioners for the district shall consist of twenty-four
voting members appointed and commissioned by the governor as follows:
(1) One member from each of the parishes of Ascension, East Baton Rouge,
East Feliciana, Jefferson, Lafourche, Livingston, Orleans, St. Charles, St. Helena, St.
James, St. John the Baptist, St. Tammany, Tangipahoa, Washington, and West
Feliciana. The governor shall designate the term of office for each member
appointed pursuant to this Paragraph so that, insofar as possible, one-third of the
initial members shall serve a one-year term, one-third a two-year term, and one-third
a three-year term.
(2) Three members from nominees provided by industrial and agricultural
user groups in the district commissioned in such manner that the wood products
industry, agriculture, and other industries are each represented by one member. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member appointed pursuant to
this Paragraph so that one member shall serve a one-year term, one shall serve for
a two-year term, and one shall serve a three-year term.
(3) Six members from nominees provided by municipalities within the
district which have a minimum use of five hundred thousand gallons per day. The
governor shall designate the term of office for each member commissioned pursuant
to this Paragraph so that two members shall serve a one-year term, two members
shall serve a two-year term, and two members shall serve a three-year term.
B. The initial voting members shall be nominated by the appropriate
nominating entity or group and presented to the governor on or before September 15,
2026. The members shall be commissioned by the governor on or before October
15, 2026.
C. Commissions pursuant to this Section, other than the initial commissions,
shall be for three-year terms.
Page 14 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
D. Each commission by the governor shall be submitted to the Senate for
confirmation.
E. In addition, the following may serve at their pleasure as ex officio
nonvoting members of the board and shall not be considered in determining a
quorum for the purpose of board meetings:
(1) The secretary of the Department of Environmental Quality or his
designee.
(2) The commissioner of agriculture and forestry or his designee.
(3) A representative of the United States Geological Survey.
(4) The secretary of the Department of Wildlife and Fisheries or his
designee.
(5) The secretary of the Department of Conservation and Energy or his
designee.
(6) A representative of the Louisiana Rural Water Association appointed by
the association.
(7) A representative of the Louisiana Cattlemen's Association appointed by
the association.
(8) A representative of the Louisiana Farm Bureau Federation appointed by
the federation.
(9) Each senator whose senatorial district includes any portion of any parish
included within the district or his designee.
(10) Each member of the House of Representatives whose representative
district includes any portion of any parish included within the district or his designee.
(11) One or more representatives of industrial users of the groundwater
appointed by the board to serve at its pleasure.
(12) The secretary of the Louisiana Department of Health.
(13) One representative from each university located within any portion of
the district.
Page 15 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
F.(1) Terms of members commissioned pursuant to Subsection A of this
Section shall commence for those initially commissioned on October 15, 2026.
Terms for commissioners subsequently commissioned shall commence on each
October fifteenth thereafter.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of R.S. 42:2, a commissioner shall not
continue to discharge the duties of his office upon expiration of his term.
G.(1) Sixty days prior to the expiration of the term of any voting member,
the board shall notify the appropriate nominating entity or group entitled to make
nomination for the member's successor.
(2) In case a vacancy occurs more than ninety days prior to the end of the
member's term, the governor shall commission a replacement within thirty days of
its occurrence to fill the unexpired term, such replacement to be the nominee of the
appropriate nominating entity or group.
(3) In case a vacancy occurs ninety or less days prior to the end of the
member's term, the position shall remain vacant for the remainder of the term.
H. Commissioners shall not be compensated for their services, except that
the board may, by regulation, provide for the payment of expenses for travel outside
the district on official business.
I. A member of a parish governing authority within the district may serve as
a commissioner.
§2463. Meetings; election of officers
A. On or before November 15, 2026, the board shall meet at the call of the
governor. At its organizational meeting, the board shall:
(1) Elect a chairman, vice chairman, secretary, and treasurer.
(2) Establish its domicile within the district.
(3) Begin consideration of the study required by R.S. 38:2474.
B. The board shall meet at least once per quarter and the location of the
meetings shall rotate between the parishes of Ascension, East Baton Rouge, East
Feliciana, Jefferson, Lafourche, Livingston, Orleans, St. Charles, St. Helena, St.
Page 16 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
James, St. John the Baptist, St. Tammany, Tangipahoa, Washington, and West
Feliciana. Once a meeting has been held in a parish, no other board meeting shall
be held in that parish until a meeting has been held in each of the other parishes.
However, the board may hold a meeting in any of the aforementioned parishes to
address concerns particular to that parish.
§2464. Powers of the board
A. The board shall conduct a study and survey of the groundwater resources
in the district, including but not limited to consideration of what is necessary or
advisable to conserve groundwater resources and where appropriate, prevent or
alleviate damaging or potentially damaging drawdowns, land surface subsidence, and
groundwater quality degradation.
B. For the purposes of this Section, the board shall hold hearings and may
do any of the following:
(1) Cooperate with and enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with
other governmental units and agencies of this state, with governments and agencies
of other states and of the United States, and with private agencies or other
groundwater conservation districts for the achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(2) Receive and expend funds from any source, public or private, for the
achievement of the purposes of this Part.
(3) Hire personnel and retain consultants as shall be reasonably necessary to
the performance of its functions. Personnel from other agencies shall be used
wherever practical and possible.
(4) Advise and consult with the secretary of the Department of Conservation
and Energy on matters that impact water resources within the board's jurisdiction.
§2465. Hearings
A. At hearings conducted by the board, members of the board or members
of its staff may testify and present exhibits or other evidence.
B. Notice of hearings by the board shall be given by publication in the
official journal of each parish within the district.
Page 17 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
C. When authorized by the board, the chairman of the board may subpoena
witnesses and require their attendance and testimony before the board. The chairman
may require the production of any books, papers, or records material to the questions
lawfully before the board. Subpoenas shall be served by any agent of the board, by
the sheriff, or by any other officer authorized by law to serve process in this state.
No person shall be excused from attending and testifying or producing books, papers,
or records, or from obeying the subpoena of the board or of a court of record on the
ground that the testimony or evidence required by such person may tend to
incriminate or subject the person to penalty or forfeiture. Nothing in this Section
shall be construed as requiring any person to produce books, papers, or records, or
to testify in response to any inquiry not pertinent to some question lawfully before
the board or a court for determination. No natural person shall be subject to criminal
prosecution or to any penalty or forfeiture relative to any testimony or evidence
required to be provided to the board or a court. However, no person testifying shall
be exempt from prosecution and punishment for perjury.
D. In the case of failure or refusal of a person to comply with a subpoena
issued by the chairman of the board, or in the case of the refusal of a witness to
testify or answer as to a matter regarding which the person may be lawfully
interrogated, any district court on application of the board may, in term time or in
vacation, issue an attachment to compel the person to comply with the subpoena and
to appear before the board with the requested documents and to give testimony upon
whatever matters are lawfully required. The court may punish for contempt those
disobeying its orders as in the case of disobedience of a subpoena issued by the court
or refusal to testify therein.
E. The board shall make a record of all hearings which shall be available for
public inspection at the office of the board during reasonable office hours.
§2466. Reports regarding groundwater resources
A. The commission shall provide a report, on or before April first annually,
regarding the district's groundwater resources to the secretary, the Senate Committee
Page 18 of 22
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1108 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1205
on Natural Resources, and the House Committee on Natural Resources and
Environment.
B. The report shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) The amount of water used for public supply, industrial purposes, and
agricultural purposes, respectively.
(2) Actual and projected saltwater intrusion or encroachment.
(3) Any current or projected sale of water for use outside of the state,
including the amount of water so sold and the price paid by each out-of-state user.
C. For the purposes of this report, the amount of water used for agricultural
or industrial purposes may be estimated.
Section 2. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby directed to redesignate the
following as Part IV of Chapter 12 of Title 38 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes, comprised
of R.S. 38:2471 through 2476:
(1) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.132 as R.S. 38:2471.
(2) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.134 as R.S. 38:2472.
(3) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.135 as R.S. 38:2473.
(4) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.136 as R.S. 38:2474.
(5) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.137 as R.S. 38:2475.
(6) Redesignate R.S. 38:3087.138 as R.S. 38:2476.
Section 3. R.S. 38:3087.131, 3087.133, and 3097.8(D) are hereby repealed in their
entirety.